Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1401
Purpose of sections.

The purposes of sections 72-1401 to 72-1408 are (1) to permit the state and cities, villages, and counties to make the most efficient use of their powers by enabling them to cooperate with each other in providing services and facilities, and (2) to permit cities, villages, and counties to assist the state by making available to the state, at no greater cost to the state than the cost thereof to the municipality, buildings and facilities, or portions thereof, thereby enabling the state better to serve the inhabitants of such cities, villages, and counties and the surrounding region thereof or better to serve the public of the state at large.

Laws 1967, c. 464, § 1, p. 1435;

Laws 1974, LB 914, § 5.